Utah statutes.
9-10-103.   Uintah Basin Revitalization Fund Board created -- Members -- Terms -- Chair -- Quorum -- Expenses.

(1)  There is created within the division the Revitalization Board composed of five members as follows:

(a)  the governor or his designee;

(b)  a Uintah County commissioner;

(c)  a Duchesne County commissioner; and

(d)  two representatives of the Business Committee of the Tribe.

(2)  The terms of office for the members of the board shall run concurrently with the terms of office for the governor, commissioners, and Business Committee of the Tribe.

(3)  The governor, or his designee, shall be the chair of the board.

(4)  Four board members are a quorum.

(5)  All decisions of the board require four affirmative votes.

(6)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.

